Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
EXTENDED HEALTH INSURANCE

Attorney General Opinions

Section 431:10A-601 applied to all parts of article 10A if
the category of policy under consideration included family coverage, as defined
in §431:10A-103. Att. Gen. Op. 97-10.

§431:10A-401 Purpose. It is the
purpose of this part to provide a means of more adequately meeting the needs of
persons who are sixty-five years of age or older and their spouses for
insurance coverage against financial loss from accident or disease through the
combined resources and experience of a number of insurers; to make possible the
fullest extension of such coverage by encouraging insurers to combine their
resources and experience and to exercise their collective efforts in the
development and offering of policies of such insurance to all such applicants
at costs lower than those generally available through individual insurers; and
to regulate the joint activities herein authorized in accordance with the
intent of Congress as expressed in the Act of Congress of March 9, 1945 (Public
Law 15, 79th Congress), as amended. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next